Maryland, session 2026, HB0959.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–221.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Fund” means the Park System Capital Improvements and Acquisition
Fund.
(b) There is a Park System Capital Improvements and Acquisition Fund.
(l) The first [$70,000,000] $74,000,000 received by the Fund may be used only
as follows:
(1) At least $5,000,000 for infrastructure projects that mitigate the effects
of climate change, including:
(i) Flood barriers;
(ii) Forest buffers;
(iii) Green spaces;
(iv) Building elevation;
(v) Stormwater infrastructure;
(vi) Wetlands restoration; and
(vii) Addressing environmental justice concerns;
(2) At least $5,000,000 for historic preservation, in accordance with
subsection (m) of this section;
(3) At least $20,000,000 for transportation improvements, including:
(i) Improving bike lanes and trails, increasing walkability, and
expanding parking availability; and
(ii) Targeting transportation investments to avoid capacity
shutdowns;
(4) At least $10,000,000 for increasing water access, including kayak and
boat launches and areas for picnicking near water and swimming; [and]

HOUSE BILL 959 3
(5) IN FISCAL YEAR 2028, $4,000,000 FOR RENOVATION OF THE TRAIL
HEADQUARTERS OFFICE IN GWYNNS FALLS/LEAKIN PARK IN ORDER TO SERVE AS A
JOINT PARTNERSHIP PARK OFFICE AND VISITOR CENTER FOR GWYNNS FALLS
STATE PARK; AND
(6) Up to $30,000,000 for land acquisition, including:
(i) Areas in the central and southern regions of the State that will:
1. Relieve overcrowding at existing State parks; and
2. Expand public access to State parks and outdoor
recreation;
(ii) Sites of significance to the history of African American, Asian,
Indigenous or Native American, and Hispanic or Latino populations in the State; and
(iii) Beachfront or waterfront property for public access.
(n) If the Fund receives more than [$70,000,000] $74,000,000, the Department
may use up to $10,000,000 for any of the purposes identified under subsection (l) of this
section, including:
(1) Land activation;
(2) New structures;
(3) Any capital improvements necessary to make State parks accessible to
people with disabilities, including providing adult changing tables; and
(4) Up to $100,000 for the Maryland Recreation Communication Boards
Pilot Program.
5–1012.
(a) In this section, “partnership park” means a unit of the State park system
managed by the Department in partnership with a local government, a bicounty agency, or
a nonprofit organization.
(b) The Department may enter into:
(1) A memorandum of understanding with a local government, bicounty
agency, or nonprofit organization to establish a partnership park in the State; or

HOUSE BILL 959
(2) A partnership agreement with a local government, bicounty agency, or
nonprofit organization to manage a partnership park in the State.
(f–1) (1) The Department and Baltimore City shall:
(i) Convene focus group meetings on the establishment of the
Gwynns Falls State Park with community members and stakeholders that reside or operate
in the vicinity of the proposed State park;
(ii) Develop a list of priority needs and associated cost assessments
for park operations and improvements, including:
1. Capital improvements;
2. Critical maintenance;
3. Enhanced natural resource management and restoration,
including implementation of a biohabitats study;
4. Historic site restoration;
5. Enhanced outdoor recreation amenities, including trail
improvements;
6. Adding park staff and procuring equipment and supplies;
and
7. Law enforcement and public safety; and
(iii) Establish a stakeholder advisory committee to advise the
Department and Baltimore City on the scope and management of Gwynns Falls State Park
that consists of:
1. At least one member of the Friends of Gwynns
Falls/Leakin Park;
2. At least six members representing local park advocacy
organizations, local environmental organizations, local historic preservation organizations,
neighborhood organizations from neighborhoods that border the future Gwynns Falls State
Park site; and
3. Any additional members as determined by the
Department and Baltimore City.
(2) On or before December 1, 2025, the Department shall submit a report
to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on:

HOUSE BILL 959 5
(i) Property owned by the State in Baltimore City that is suitable
for inclusion in Gwynns Falls State Park;
(ii) Property owned by Baltimore City or a nonprofit organization in
Baltimore City that is suitable for inclusion in Gwynns Falls State Park and for which the
landowners are willing to enter into a partnership agreement; and
(iii) The funding needed to establish and promote Gwynns Falls State
Park.
(F–2) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH GWYNNS FALLS STATE
PARK AS A PARTNERSHIP PARK BETWEEN THE DEPARTMENT AND BALTIMORE CITY
THAT SEEKS TO PROVIDE VISITORS WITH ACCESSIBLE OUTDOOR, NATURE–BASED
RECREATION AND LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES.
(2) GWYNNS FALLS STATE PARK SHALL BE HELD BY THE STATE AS A
STATE PARK UNDER THE PROTECTION AND ADMINISTRATION OF THE
DEPARTMENT.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT CHARGE ANY ENTRANCE FEE TO
GWYNNS FALLS STATE PARK.
(4) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
GWYNNS FALLS STATE PARK SHALL CONSIST OF THE AREA OF LAND IDENTIFIED
UNDER SECTION 7 OF BALTIMORE CITY’S GWYNNS FALLS STATE PARK REPORT
SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F–1)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH BALTIMORE
CITY, SHALL HIRE AN INDEPENDENT CONSULTANT TO COMPLETE A
COMPREHENSIVE PARK MASTER PLAN FOR GWYNNS FALLS STATE PARK THAT
WILL:
1. DEFINE THE EXACT BOUNDARIES OF GWYNNS FALLS
STATE PARK; AND
2. INCLUDE ENGAGING CITIZENS IN THE PLANNING OF
GWYNNS FALLS STATE PARK.
(5) THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING ESTABLISHING THE
GWYNNS FALLS STATE PARK SHALL DEFINE:
(I) THE ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES, INCLUDING FINANCIAL
RESPONSIBILITIES, OF THE DEPARTMENT AND BALTIMORE CITY IN MAINTAINING
AND OPERATING THE STATE PARK; AND

HOUSE BILL 959
(II) A PARTNERSHIP ROLE FOR THE FRIENDS OF GWYNNS
FALLS/LEAKIN PARK IN SUPPORT OF THE STATE PARK’S MISSION AND
VOLUNTEERS.
(6) THE GWYNNS FALLS STATE PARK STAKEHOLDER ADVISORY
COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (F–1) OF THIS SECTION SHALL:
(I) MEET QUARTERLY; AND
(II) ADVISE THE DEPARTMENT ON THE SCOPE, MANAGEMENT,
AND IMPROVEMENTS TO GWYNNS FALLS STATE PARK.
(7) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL:
(I) AN APPROPRIATION OF $2,880,354 FOR THE
ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION COSTS OF GWYNNS FALLS STATE PARK; AND
(II) AN APPROPRIATION OF $280,000 FOR THE HIRING OF THE
INDEPENDENT CONSULTANT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.